California, session 20252026, AB785.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 8270) is added to Division 8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: CHAPTER 9. Community Violence Interdiction Grant Program8270. (a) The California Health and Human Services Agency shall administer the Community Violence Interdiction Grant Program to provide funding to local community programs for community-driven solutions to decrease violence in neighborhoods and schools.(b) Eligible programs shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1) Evidence-based, focused-deterrence collaborative programs that conduct outreach to targeted gangs and offer supportive services to preemptively reduce and eliminate violence and gang involvement.(2) Programs that create and enhance recreation- and health-based interventions for youth during peak times of violence.(3) Programs that implement evidence-based interventions for pupils impacted by trauma for the improvement in the health and well-being of the youth and school and community stability.(4) Youth diversion programs that promote positive youth development by relying on responses that prevent a youth’s involvement or further involvement in the justice system.(5) The creation and operation of school-based health centers.8271. (a) The agency shall develop an application process and criteria for funding.(b) Grants pursuant to this chapter shall be made on a competitive basis with preference to cities and local jurisdictions that are disproportionately impacted by violence and gang involvement and with preference to community-based organizations that serve the residents of those cities and local jurisdictions.(c) In implementing the grant program, the agency shall work with relevant stakeholders to promote and implement the grant program in a manner that effectively reaches a wide geography throughout the state and ensures that regions most impacted by violence and gang involvement are adequately considered with an emphasis on addressing the violence prevention and gang deterrence needs within these regions.(d) Applicants seeking grant funding to implement evidenced-based evidence-based interventions for pupils impacted by trauma shall demonstrate how they will prioritize interventions for pupils most impacted by trauma and typically unable to access traditional services, including, but not limited to, pupils who are low income or homeless, display symptoms of post-traumatic stress disorder or severe trauma-related symptoms, members of immigrant and refugee groups, pupils with exceptional needs, and pupils who interact with child protective systems or who have had contact with the juvenile justice system.8272. (a) The Community Violence Interdiction Grant Fund is hereby created within the State Treasury. Moneys in the fund shall be made available, only upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the agency for the purposes of this chapter.(b) On or before July 31, 2025, 2026, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Director of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall calculate the savings that accrued to the state from the closure of state prisons during the preceding fiscal year. In making the calculation required by this subdivision, the Director of Finance and the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall use actual data or best available estimates where actual data is not available.(c) The Director of Finance shall calculate the average of the two calculations made pursuant to subdivision (b). The calculation shall be final and shall not be adjusted for subsequent changes in the underlying data. The Director of Finance shall certify the results of the calculation to the Controller no later than August 1 of each fiscal year.(d) Before August 15, 2025, 2026, and before August 15 of each fiscal year thereafter, upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Controller shall transfer from the General Fund to the Community Violence Interdiction Grant Fund the total amount calculated pursuant to subdivision (c).